Utah statutes.
53C-2-201.   Planning procedures -- Assistance from other state agencies -- Plans consistent with trust responsibilities.

(1)  The director:

(a)  shall develop rules describing the degree of planning necessary for each category of activity on trust lands; and

(b)  may request other state agencies to generate technical data or other support services for the development and implementation of trust lands plans.

(2)  The plans for school and institutional trust lands shall be:

(a)  developed in a manner consistent with the director's responsibility to insure that the interest of the trust beneficiaries is paramount; and

(b)  if required by rule, approved by the board.

(3)  The director shall make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for notifying and consulting with interested parties  under this section.

(4)  Subject to Subsection (1), the development of a written plan is not a prerequisite to actions by the director.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

